Hawaii statutes.
[§188F-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

"Department" means the department of
land and natural resources.

"Management area" means the West
Hawaii regional fishery management area established in section 188F-2.

"Plan" means the West Hawaii regional
fishery management area plan established in section 188F-4. [L 1998, c 306, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next